New York, session 2025-2026, A2424.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 131 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 5-b to read as follows: 3 5-b. No public assistance shall be given to an applicant for public 4 assistance who has not been a resident of the state for at least ninety 5 days prior to applying for such assistance. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 7 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01053-01-5